test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-puhelin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - puhelin: # 1
    puhelin+N+Sg+Nom: puhelin
    puhelin+N+Sg+Gen: puhelin
    puhelin+N+Sg+Acc: puhelin
    puhelin+N+Sg+Ill: puhelimân
    puhelin+N+Sg+Loc: puhelimist
    puhelin+N+Sg+Com: puhelimáin
    puhelin+N+Sg+Abe: puhelimttáá
    puhelin+N+Ess:    puhelimin
    puhelin+N+Par:    puhelimid
    puhelin+N+Pl+Nom: puhelimeh
    puhelin+N+Pl+Gen: puhelimij
    puhelin+N+Pl+Acc: puhelimijd
    puhelin+N+Pl+Ill: puhelimáid
    puhelin+N+Pl+Loc: puhelimijn
    puhelin+N+Pl+Com: puhelimijguin
    puhelin+N+Pl+Abe: puhelimijttáá
